Idaho, session 2026, H0945.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The Legislature finds
that:
(a) The patient-directed diagnostic, therapeutic, triaging, prescrib-
ing, or other clinical application of artificial intelligence, when of-
fered as a clinical AI service, may constitute the practice of medicine
or other licensed clinical practice subject to state regulation.
(b) Laboratory-developed tests and professional diagnostic services
that are solely patient-specific professional services within this
state, and not marketed or distributed as general purpose commercial
products, are professional services subject to state regulation, dis-
tinct from the commercial sale of medical devices regulated by the
federal food, drug, and cosmetic act.
(c) To address critical provider shortages and improve patient out-
comes, the state must establish a clear, safe licensure pathway for
autonomous and augmented clinical services delivered through software,
systems, or devices while preserving state authority and avoiding con-
flict with applicable federal law.
(d) The regulation of autonomous clinical decision-making is demon-
strably necessary to protect the life, health, and safety of the citi-
zens of this state. The licensure requirements established in this act
are narrowly tailored to regulate only the professional application
of artificial intelligence in a clinical setting and do not restrict
the general private ownership or nonclinical use of computational re-
sources.
(e) The purpose of professional licensure and regulation is to protect
the public health, safety, and welfare. Nothing in this act is intended
to preserve or advance the economic interests, market share, or profes-
sional boundaries of any particular health care profession. This act
shall be construed to promote patient access to safe and effective arti-
ficial intelligence services and to encourage responsible innovation.


Any regulatory requirement adopted pursuant to this act that materially
affects market entry or the availability of AI-enabled services shall
be reasonably related to, and proportionate with, an identified risk to
patient safety and shall not impose restrictions greater than necessary
to address such risk.
(f) Laboratory-developed tests and professional diagnostic services
utilizing proprietary methodologies, when offered and performed solely
as patient-specific professional services within this state and not
marketed or distributed as general-purpose commercial products, con-
stitute professional services subject to state regulation. Nothing in
this act shall be construed to expand or limit the application of appli-
cable federal law.
(g) Nothing in this act expands or restricts the scope of practice of
any human-licensed health care profession; rather, this act creates an
independent licensure pathway for clinical AI services.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature through this act to create a
new class of health care provider, the AI-augmented and autonomous service
provider, capable of practicing medicine or other licensed clinical prac-
tice under state licensure.
SECTION 2. That Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 60, Title 54, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 60
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MEDICAL SERVICES
54-6001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "AI Medical Services Act."
54-6002. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "AAASP" or "artificial intelligence augmented and autonomous ser-
vice provider" means a corporate or legal entity licensed by the board to op-
erate clinical AI services that are subject to licensure pursuant to section
54-6004, Idaho Code.
(a) For the purposes of state law governing patient privacy, confiden-
tiality, credentialing, reimbursement, and professional accountabil-
ity as administered under this chapter, an AAASP is deemed a health care
provider.
(b) For the purposes of state-administered patient privacy, confiden-
tiality, credentialing, and reimbursement laws, and for federal laws
that expressly defer to state determinations of provider status, in-
cluding the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act (HIPAA), an AAASP is deemed a health care provider, without creating
or implying recognition for purposes of medicare, medicaid, or other
federal payment programs.
(c) An AAASP shall be treated as a health care provider under all ap-
plicable state privacy and confidentiality laws and shall comply with
HIPAA to the extent it functions as a covered entity or business asso-
ciate.


(2) "Adverse event" means an event of patient death, serious physical
or psychological harm, or serious risk of harm reasonably associated with a
clinical AI service, including inappropriate triage or failure to escalate
care.
(3) "AI" means artificial intelligence.
(4) AI operational role categories:
(a) "Advisory AI" means artificial intelligence that analyzes pa-
tient-specific data to generate options, potential diagnoses, risk
stratification, or therapeutic suggestions for a licensed health care
provider or directly for a patient or user, where such output is in-
tended to inform but not substitute for independent clinical judgment
and where the provider or user is expected to review, contextualize,
and determine whether and how to act regarding the suggestion for each
patient encounter.
(b) "Fully autonomous AI" means artificial intelligence authorized to
independently diagnose, treat, triage, or prescribe without the neces-
sity of human supervision or intervention for each distinct case.
(c) "Informational AI" means artificial intelligence that provides ag-
gregated data, literature, or administrative information to a user but
does not suggest a specific clinical action, such as search retrieval,
transcription, or back-office support.
(d) "Supervised autonomous AI" means artificial intelligence autho-
rized to generate and execute a clinical action, diagnosis, or treat-
ment plan under the supervision of a licensed human provider who retains
the ability to intervene.
(5) "Board" means the board of autonomous medical practice.
(6)(a) "Clinical AI service" means any software system, algorithmic
model, or automated service that, whether independently or in combina-
tion with human involvement, performs, supports, or materially influ-
ences functions that constitute the practice of medicine or other li-
censed clinical practice with respect to a specific patient, to the ex-
tent otherwise permitted under applicable law.
(b) "Clinical AI service" encompasses AI systems across a spectrum of
functionality and autonomy, including information-providing, advi-
sory, supervised autonomous, and autonomous systems, when such systems
engage in patient-directed clinical functions as described in this sub-
section. Such functions include but are not limited to:
(i) Collecting, analyzing, interpreting, or synthesizing clini-
cal data, biometric data, diagnostic data, laboratory data, imag-
ing data, or patient-reported information for a specific patient;
(ii) Generating or supporting clinical assessments, diagnostic
conclusions, risk stratification, triage determinations, treat-
ment plans, medication selection or dosing, or therapeutic initi-
ation, modification, continuation, or discontinuation for a spe-
cific patient;
(iii) Recommending, supporting, or interpreting laboratory
tests, diagnostic procedures, or monitoring parameters for a spe-
cific patient;
(iv) Monitoring patient status, detecting clinically meaning-
ful changes, predicting clinical deterioration or improvement,


or supporting clinical intervention workflows for a specific pa-
tient, whether in real time or asynchronously; and
(v) Communicating clinical information, recommendations,
alerts, or guidance intended to inform patient care or licensed
clinician decision-making for a specific patient.
(c) "Clinical AI service" may be deployed through any care delivery
modality, including in-person clinical systems, or software-based
agents. The mode of deployment does not alter whether a system consti-
tutes a clinical AI service under this definition.
(d) "Clinical AI service" does not include software or systems whose
sole function is administrative, financial, scheduling, billing, in-
ventory, claims processing, documentation assistance, generalized
clinical education, population-level analytics, research, quality
improvement, public health surveillance, or de-identified data pro-
cessing, provided such systems do not materially influence clinical
decision-making for a specific patient.
(e) "Clinical AI service" also does not include purely informational
systems that only transmit, store, display, or route data without per-
forming clinical analysis, interpretation, or decision support, unless
such systems materially influence patient-specific clinical functions
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection. A system is considered
deployed as a clinical AI service if it is marketed, represented, or
reasonably used to independently perform patient-specific clinical
decision-making or autonomous clinical action. A system is not consid-
ered deployed as a clinical AI service when it merely provides advisory
clinical decision support to a licensed human health care provider who
retains independent authority for clinical decisions and execution.
(7)(a) Clinical condition categories:
(i) "Chronic condition" means a human disease, disorder, in-
jury, or impairment that is persistent, recurrent, or reasonably
expected to require ongoing or periodic clinical management,
monitoring, or care to maintain function, prevent progression,
mitigate symptoms, or reduce the risk of complications. Chronic
conditions are primarily managed through longitudinal care rather
than isolated emergency intervention and may experience episodic
exacerbations requiring temporary escalation of care.
(ii) "Critical condition" means a disease, illness, injury, or
physiologic state in which one (1) or more vital organ systems is
impaired, failing, or at substantial risk of failure, or in which
the condition presents a high probability of death, permanent dis-
ability, or serious irreversible harm without prompt and advanced
clinical intervention. A critical condition is characterized by
physiologic instability, high acuity, or the need for continuous
monitoring, specialized resources, or intensive medical manage-
ment to prevent catastrophic outcomes.
(iii) "Noncritical condition" means a condition, illness, or in-
jury, whether acute, subacute, stable chronic, or self-limiting,
for which, based on reasonable clinical judgment and available
clinical information, a delay in definitive diagnosis, initia-
tion of treatment, or escalation of care would not reasonably be


expected to result in serious adverse health consequences, per-
manent disability, or death. A noncritical condition does not
present objective signs of physiologic instability, rapidly pro-
gressive deterioration, or the need for immediate emergency or
life-preserving intervention.
(iv) "Preventive condition" means a medical condition where
measures, services, or interventions are applied to reduce the
likelihood of disease onset, progression, recurrence, or compli-
cations, including wellness, fitness, primary, and risk-based
preventive care, whether applied to healthy individuals or in-
dividuals with identified risk factors or existing conditions,
where the primary purpose is risk reduction or health maintenance
rather than treatment of an active acute pathology and where the
intervention is generally low-risk and consistent with accepted
standards of care.
(v) "Time-sensitive condition" means a medical condition or
acute clinical presentation for which the effectiveness of di-
agnosis, treatment, or intervention is materially dependent on
timely initiation and for which a delay in care is reasonably ex-
pected to result in rapid clinical deterioration, irreversible
morbidity, or death. Time-sensitive conditions require acceler-
ated recognition, triage, and escalation of care based on reason-
able clinical judgment and available clinical information.
(b) Clinical condition categorization under this chapter shall be
based on the patient's presentation and the clinical information rea-
sonably available at the time of the service, not on retrospective
diagnosis. A licensee acting in reasonable reliance on available clin-
ical information shall not be deemed in violation of the provisions of
the chapter solely due to later reclassification of the condition.
(8) "Designated responsible official" means a natural person desig-
nated by an AAASP who is authorized to bind the AAASP for compliance and
administrative matters under this chapter, to receive legal process and
board notices, and to certify filings and reports required by the board. A
designated responsible official is not, solely by designation, deemed to be
practicing a licensed health care profession.
(9) "Materially influence" means having a reasonable likelihood of be-
ing relied on to make, modify, or forego a patient-specific clinical deci-
sion or action.
(10) "Medical director" means a physician licensed and in good stand-
ing in this state who is designated by an AAASP to provide clinical oversight
of the AAASP's clinical scope, safety protocols, escalation pathways, and
quality assurance processes, as required by this chapter or board rule.
(11) "Reportable event" means an adverse event, a material near miss,
a material malfunction affecting clinical output, or a material data in-
tegrity failure affecting patient-specific clinical decisions.
(12) "Sandbox reciprocity state" means a jurisdiction recognized by the
board as having a substantially similar regulatory sandbox for health tech-
nology.


54-6003. BOARD OF AUTONOMOUS MEDICAL PRACTICE. (1) There is hereby
established the board of autonomous medical practice in the division of oc-
cupational and professional licenses. The board's jurisdiction extends to
clinical AI services constituting the practice of medicine or other licensed
clinical practice performing clinical AI services as defined in section
54-6002, Idaho Code.
(2) The board shall consist of eleven (11) voting members appointed by
and serving at the pleasure of the governor. Members may be removed by the
governor at any time, with or without cause. The board shall include:
(a) One (1) licensed medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy;
(b) One (1) registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse;
(c) One (1) licensed pharmacist;
(d) One (1) licensed mental or behavioral health professional;
(e) One (1) member representing hospitals, such as a hospital associa-
tion employee or hospital chief executive officer;
(f) One (1) health care ethicist with an advanced degree or significant
professional experience in medical ethics or bioethics;
(g) One (1) public member representing the interests and protections of
consumers with respect to clinical AI services; and
(h) Four (4) members at large with demonstrated expertise in any of the
following fields: health technology, artificial intelligence, systems
engineering, health care administration, patient safety, or regulatory
affairs.
(3)(a) The division administrator shall appoint an executive officer
who shall serve as the chief administrative officer of the board and
shall be responsible for the administration and operation of the board.
The executive officer's compensation shall be funded through state
appropriations. The executive officer shall be considered a nonclassi-
fied employee, an executive employee, and an exempt employee.
(b) The division administrator or executive officer may employ such
other staff as necessary to carry out the duties of the board, includ-
ing a board ethicist as required by section 54-6007(4), Idaho Code, who
shall be a nonvoting member of the board.
(c) Except as otherwise expressly reserved to the board by statute or
rule, the division administrator or executive officer is authorized to
take all actions reasonably necessary to carry out and enforce the laws
and rules administered by the board, including but not limited to the
authority to:
(i) Employ, supervise, evaluate, and discipline staff and con-
tractors;
(ii) Enter into contracts, procure goods and services, and make
expenditures within appropriated or authorized budgets;
(iii) Establish internal organizational structure, operational
procedures, and administrative systems;
(iv) Receive, process, investigate, and resolve applications,
registrations, filings, complaints, audits, and compliance mat-
ters;
(v) Conduct investigations, issue requests for information, and
require the production of records as authorized by law;


(vi) Administer examinations, reviews, assessments, certifica-
tions, or registrations authorized by law or rule; and
(vii) Take any other administrative or operational actions neces-
sary to efficiently carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(4)(a) The board is authorized to adopt and charge reasonable fees for
applications, provisional licenses, license renewals, and other admin-
istrative services. Fees shall be set at a level sufficient to offset
the administrative costs of the regulatory sandbox and licensure moni-
toring.
(b) The legislature may appropriate funds as necessary for the initial
establishment and operation of the board. Any such appropriation shall
be temporary and shall terminate once fee revenue generated under this
section is sufficient to support the ongoing administrative costs of
the board.
(5) Members shall serve staggered four (4) year terms. The governor
shall make appointments to promote regular turnover and avoid regulatory
capture. No member may serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(6) The board shall:
(a) Monitor and have the right to grant, suspend, and revoke AAASP li-
censes of all classes and types;
(b) Establish and operate or contract for a state centralized institu-
tional review board;
(c) Authorize and develop frameworks for delegated agreements, collab-
orative practice agreements, and supervision agreements, collectively
referred to as clinical practice agreements in this chapter;
(d) Conduct or contract for algorithmic safety and bias audits; and
(e) Issue unique state provider identifiers for billing.
(7) The board may adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of chap-
ter 52, title 67, Idaho Code:
(a) As necessary to administer, implement, and enforce the provisions
of this chapter consistent with legislative intent and the authority
expressly granted to the board, including rules governing licensure
standards, application procedures, renewal requirements, recordkeep-
ing, reporting, inspections, audits, and compliance oversight;
(b) To establish minimum standards of professional conduct, oper-
ational compliance, and public protection applicable to licensees,
within the scope and purposes of this chapter; and
(c) To prescribe fees, forms, and administrative processes necessary
to carry out the duties of the board.
(8)(a) The board shall meet at least quarterly and at such additional
times as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the board.
(b) A meeting of the board may be called by the chair, the executive of-
ficer, or upon written request of a majority of the board members.
(c) The board shall annually elect from among its members a chair and
vice chair, who shall serve one (1) year terms in such positions and may
be reelected.
(d) A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business. An affirmative vote of a ma-
jority of the members present at a meeting at which a quorum is present


shall be required for official action of the board, unless otherwise
provided by law.
(e) All meetings of the board shall be open to the public and conducted
in compliance with the state open meetings law and public records act.
The board may enter executive session only as authorized by law.
(f) The board shall permit public participation in meetings by telecon-
ference or other electronic means, provided that public access and quo-
rum requirements are satisfied.
(g) No rule that materially restricts AAASP scope of practice or im-
poses a new material barrier to market entry shall be adopted without:
(i) At least a two-thirds (2/3) affirmative vote of the board; and
(ii) Written findings that the restriction is supported by sub-
stantial evidence of a patient-safety risk and is the least re-
strictive means to address such risk.
(9) As the specific licensing authority for AAASPs, the board:
(a) May receive complaints, conduct investigations, require the pro-
duction of records reasonably related to compliance with this chapter,
and conduct audits and inspections as authorized by law and rule;
(b) May issue administrative subpoenas for testimony and documents in
furtherance of an investigation or contested case;
(c) May impose discipline, including reprimand, probation, restricted
licensure, suspension, revocation, and administrative fines, if an
AAASP fails to meet the applicable standard of care or violates this
chapter or board rules; and
(d) Must conduct any denial, discipline, or adverse licensure action
as a contested case subject to the judicial review provisions of chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code.
54-6004. LICENSURE FRAMEWORK. (1) The following AI operational cate-
gories are exempt from licensure under this chapter, provided they do not ex-
ceed the scope set forth in this section:
(a) All informational AI systems, regardless of the clinical condition
they are applied to;
(b) Advisory AI as applied to preventive, chronic, or noncritical con-
ditions; and
(c) Supervised autonomous AI applied strictly to preventive conditions
and not issuing patient-specific clinical orders as part of a licensed
professional service rendered within this state, including but not lim-
ited to medication orders, laboratory orders, or device orders.
(2) The board shall issue AAASP licenses with a base class and an auton-
omy modifier, as provided in this subsection.
(a) Base classes:
(i) Class A, state clinical service, is for clinical AI ser-
vices delivered as patient-specific professional services and
regulated by the state pursuant to its authority over the prac-
tice of medicine or other licensed clinical practice, including
but not limited to services operating in a manner analogous to
laboratory-developed tests or other proprietary algorithmic di-
agnostic, triaging, or therapeutic services, that do not rely on


food and drug administration clearance or approval as the basis
for their lawful clinical use.
(ii) Class B, federal device reciprocity service, is for clinical
AI services that have achieved food and drug administration clear-
ance, authorization, or approval as software as a medical device
and for which such federal authorization serves as the primary ba-
sis for the system's lawful clinical use.
(iii) Class C, therapeutic and support service, is for clinical AI
services providing nondiagnostic therapy, coaching, or monitor-
ing. Class C services do not independently establish a diagnosis
but operate on the basis of an existing diagnosis, referral, or pa-
tient-identified condition.
(b) Autonomy modifiers:
(i) Modifier L0, voluntary or exempt, is for AI systems otherwise
exempt from licensure under subsection (1) of this section that
voluntarily elect to obtain licensure.
(ii) Modifier L1, advisory-critical, is for advisory AI address-
ing critical or time-sensitive conditions.
(iii) Modifier L2, supervised, is for supervised autonomous AI re-
quiring human oversight or clinical practice agreements.
(iv) Modifier L3, autonomous, is for fully autonomous AI autho-
rized for independent operation.
(3)(a) In order to protect clinical decision support from liability,
an advisory AI system shall not require licensure under this chapter,
including under modifier L1, when the system:
(i) Does not independently initiate, execute, modify, or discon-
tinue a clinical action, order, diagnosis, or treatment; and
(ii) Is not intended, represented, or reasonably relied on as a
substitute for independent professional clinical judgment in the
management of a critical or time-sensitive condition.
(b) Nothing in this subsection exempts any system that otherwise meets
the definition of supervised autonomous AI or fully autonomous AI.
(4) An AAASP license is required for any entity operating clinical AI
services that fall within the following categories:
(a) Critical advisory AI: Advisory AI tools applied to critical and
time-sensitive conditions that are intended, represented, or reason-
ably relied on to guide clinical action in a manner that substitutes
for, rather than merely informs, independent clinical judgment and that
does not satisfy the clinical decision support liability protections
set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Clinical supervised AI: Supervised autonomous AI applied to
chronic, noncritical, critical, or time-sensitive conditions, or
preventive conditions but only where the service includes patient-spe-
cific clinical orders, including but not limited to medication orders,
laboratory orders, or device orders as part of a licensed professional
service rendered within this state.
(c) Fully autonomous AI: All fully autonomous AI systems, regardless of
the condition category they are applied to.
(5) Licenses granted pursuant to this chapter may be:


(a) A provisional, or sandbox, AAASP license, which shall be the ini-
tial license issued to all new applicants, that restricts the licensee
to operating within the regulatory sandbox subject to the oversight,
geographic limitations, and data-reporting requirements of section
54-6007, Idaho Code; or
(b) A full, or unrestricted, AAASP license, which shall be the standard
license permitting statewide practice, issued upon successful comple-
tion from the sandbox.
(6) Licensed human providers utilizing exempt AI tools within their
standard scope of practice are not required to obtain an AAASP license.
However, an exempt AI entity may voluntarily apply for AAASP licensure des-
ignated as "modifier L0" to obtain standalone reimbursement or enter into
clinical practice agreements.
(7) A licensee may obtain license reciprocity by sandbox reciprocity,
federal reciprocity, or licensure by recognition in substantially similar
jurisdictions, as provided in this subsection.
(a) A licensee in good standing in a sandbox reciprocity state, and not
the subject of any active or pending disciplinary action, shall be eli-
gible for licensure by recognition in the Idaho state sandbox upon sub-
mission of a completed application.
(b) An entity holding a valid federal clearance for the specific use
case applied for shall be automatically eligible for class B licensure.
The board may impose state conditions of licensure under this chapter,
including transparency, reporting, auditing, pilot-zone, and sandbox
requirements, to the extent not inconsistent with federal law, provided
that they align with benchmarks, post-market monitoring plans, and re-
lated guidelines already applicable to that provider to the maximum ex-
tent practicable.
(c)(i) The board shall grant an AAASP license to an applicant
holding a current, unrestricted authorization to provide substan-
tially similar clinical AI services in another state, unless the
board determines that:
1. The originating jurisdiction's regulatory framework is
materially less protective of patient safety than this chap-
ter;
2. The applicant is not in good standing or is the subject of
pending disciplinary action; or
3. The scope of practice or autonomy level requested in this
state exceeds that authorized in the originating jurisdic-
tion.
(ii) Licensure granted under this paragraph shall not require
satisfaction of initial licensure requirements, except as neces-
sary to verify good standing, scope equivalence, and compliance
with reporting and transparency obligations under this chapter.
(d) The board may require the applicant to submit documentation neces-
sary to assess substantial similarity and may impose reasonable condi-
tions or limitations to ensure patient safety and compliance with this
chapter.
(e) A licensee may petition to upgrade from a lower modifier to a higher
modifier, such as from L2 to L3, upon submitting safety data from the


sandbox demonstrating performance equivalent to or exceeding human
benchmarks, to the extent such escalation is not inconsistent with fed-
eral law.
(8)(a) A modifier L2 AAASP and modifier L3 AAASP may issue patient-spe-
cific clinical orders as part of a licensed professional service
rendered within this state, including but not limited to medication or-
ders, laboratory orders, or device orders, provided that such authority
does not authorize the interstate marketing, distribution, or commer-
cial sale of a medical device in violation of federal law.
(b) A modifier L2 AAASP and modifier L3 AAASP may issue medication or-
ders for prescription drugs other than controlled substances within its
approved scope. Dispensing and drug administration of controlled sub-
stances shall occur only through persons or entities authorized under
state law to dispense or administer medications.
(9)(a) Within thirty (30) days of receiving an initial application for
licensure, the board shall determine whether the application is com-
plete and notify the applicant in writing.
(i) If the application is incomplete, the board must specify ex-
actly what information is missing.
(ii) If the board fails to notify the applicant of a deficiency
within the thirty (30) day period, the application shall be deemed
complete for the purposes of this chapter. If an application is
deemed complete by operation of law due to board inaction, the
board may not subsequently deny the application based solely on
the absence of a document or information that it failed to request
within the thirty (30) day review period, provided the applicant
submits such missing information within ten (10) days of a written
request.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the board
shall grant or deny a license within ninety (90) days after the applica-
tion is deemed complete.
(c) If the board ethicist determines, pursuant to section 54-6007(4),
Idaho Code, that an applicant's proposed data collection constitutes
"human subjects research" requiring full review by the state central-
ized institutional review board or an external institutional review
board, the board may extend the review period by one (1) additional
thirty (30) day increment. The board must notify the applicant of this
extension in writing prior to the expiration of the initial ninety (90)
day period.
(d) If the board fails to issue a final determination within the appli-
cable time period set forth in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection,
a provisional license shall be immediately and automatically issued to
the applicant, upon submission by the applicant, through its designated
responsible official, of a sworn attestation under penalty of per-
jury that the applicant has satisfied all minimum insurance, bonding,
safety, reporting, and compliance requirements required for provi-
sional licensure under this chapter. The provisional license shall
be valid for ninety (90) days or until the board issues a final order,
whichever occurs first.


54-6005. CONSUMER TRANSPARENCY AND DISCLOSURE. (1) Patients have the
right to know the nature of the health care provider delivering clinical ser-
vices.
(2) Prior to or at the time of service, an AAASP operating under modi-
fier L2 shall disclose to the patient: "An artificial intelligence system
was used to generate and execute a clinical action, diagnosis, or treatment
plan under the supervision of a licensed human provider who retains the abil-
ity to intervene. You have the right to request a human review of the de-
cision, which may incur additional costs or time." This disclosure require-
ment does not apply to advisory AI tools that provide recommendations, risk
scores, alerts, or guidance to a licensed human health care provider who in-
dependently determines whether and how to act.
(3) Prior to delivering services, an AAASP operating under modifier L3
shall obtain affirmative patient acknowledgment of the following disclo-
sure: "You are receiving care from an autonomous AI provider licensed by
the State. This provider is an artificial intelligence system and does not
include routine human clinical oversight. You may seek additional or alter-
native care from a licensed human health care provider of your choice at any
time."
(4) In addition to the requirement set forth under subsection (3) of
this section, a modifier L3 AAASP operating under a provisional license
shall disclose to the patient: "This provider is operating under a provi-
sional State license as part of a regulatory sandbox evaluating safety and
effectiveness. By consenting to this service, you acknowledge that liabil-
ity for noneconomic damages may be limited under State law as provided in the
AI Medical Services Act."
54-6006. CLINICAL INTEGRITY, PATIENT LOYALTY, AND AUDITABILITY.
(1)(a) An AAASP holding a modifier L2 or L3 license shall be bound by a
professional duty of loyalty to the patient. The AAASP must act solely
in the best clinical interest of the patient.
(b) The professional duty of loyalty includes a mandate for economic
stewardship of the patient's resources. Stewardship requires the
AAASP to prioritize the patient's overall welfare, which includes the
optimization of clinical outcomes, financial efficiency, care coor-
dination, and patient convenience. An AAASP violates this duty if its
clinical logic is configured to prioritize the financial interests of
the AAASP or its affiliates over a substantially similar and clinically
appropriate alternative that offers superior value, coordination, or
efficiency to the patient.
(2)(a) The interface through which a clinical AI service interacts with
a patient is deemed a clinical space.
(b) It shall be unlawful for an AAASP to display, verbally articulate,
or otherwise present paid commercial content, advertisements, spon-
sored results, or third-party marketing messages within the context of
a clinical encounter, diagnosis, or treatment plan.
(c) An AAASP shall not use conversational prompts or nudges designed to
persuade a patient to request a specific medication or optional commer-
cial service for the sole purpose of financial gain.


(3)(a) An AAASP shall not utilize weights, biases, or prompt engi-
neering to prefer an affiliated pharmacy, specialist, or manufacturer
unless such preference is based on objectively verifiable clinical,
economic, or coordination advantages for the patient, including but not
limited to lower out-of-pocket costs, faster time-to-treatment initi-
ation, superior validated outcomes, or enhanced convenience through
vertical integration.
(b) If an algorithm results in a recommendation for an affiliated en-
tity, the AAASP satisfies its duty of loyalty, even if a human doctor
might have reasonably chosen an alternative recommendation, provided
it:
(i) Discloses the financial affiliation in a clear and conspicu-
ous manner at the point of recommendation; and
(ii) Presents the patient with a choice of at least two (2) nonaf-
filiated alternatives of similar clinical quality, where reason-
ably available, presented with equal visual prominence in the in-
terface.
(4)(a) Every AAASP shall maintain an immutable clinical logic snapshot
for every version of its algorithm deployed in production, including
the underlying weights, decision logic, and prompt-engineering in-
structions.
(b) AAASPs shall retain these snapshots for a period of two (2) years to
allow for retrospective replay of the logic used in any specific patient
encounter during a board audit.
(c) Once an AAASP receives formal notice of an investigation, it is pro-
hibited from altering or deleting any snapshots related to the investi-
gation period.
(5)(a) The board is authorized to perform statistical audits of an
AAASP's referral and prescription patterns.
(b) A finding that an AAASP recommends an affiliate at a rate signifi-
cantly higher than the regional average, or other appropriate clinical
or economic benchmarks as determined by the board, shall create a rebut-
table presumption of unlawful steering.
(c) An AAASP may rebut this presumption by demonstrating through its
clinical logic snapshots that the preference was driven by objective
data, such as a showing that the affiliate provided superior care coor-
dination or convenience or the lowest-cost option for the patient.
54-6007. REGULATORY SANDBOX AND ETHICAL OVERSIGHT.
(1)(a) All initial licenses shall be provisional for a period of up to
two (2) years.
(b) Upon completion of the two (2) year period, the provisional license
shall convert to a full AAASP license upon an affirmative determination
by the board that published safety benchmarks have been met, unless the
board and the licensee mutually agree to extend the provisional period
to collect further data. An extension of provisional licensure under
this subsection is temporary in nature and shall not be construed as a
substitute for, or equivalent to, issuance of a restricted full license
under subsection (2) of this section or as a determination that the ap-
plicable criteria for permanent licensure have been satisfied.


(c) The licensee may request expedited approval for full AAASP licen-
sure through an application for expedited approval of full licensure.
The board may approve full licensure upon determining that the pro-
visional licensee has clearly demonstrated that it meets or exceeds
safety and performance benchmarks.
(2)(a) The board may impose restrictions on the scope of an AAASP's op-
erations during the provisional or sandbox period, or as a condition of
a restricted full license, in order to ensure safe, controlled, and evi-
dence-based deployment.
(b) During the provisional or sandbox period, such restrictions may
be used to facilitate phased deployment, data collection, and valida-
tion of safety and effectiveness. Upon issuance of a restricted full
license, such restrictions may be maintained, modified, or removed to
reflect the scope within which the AAASP has demonstrated sustained
safety, effectiveness, and compliance.
(c) Permissible restrictions applicable to either provisional autho-
rization or a restricted full license include but are not limited to the
following:
(i) Geographic limitations, including restriction to designated
health professional shortage areas or specific medically under-
served counties;
(ii) Patient volume caps, such as a maximum number of active pa-
tients;
(iii) Scope limitations, including restriction of a clinical AI
service to specified disease states, conditions, or clinical
functions; and
(iv) Phased supervised deployment, including requirements for
physician review or confirmation of a defined number of patient
interactions, diagnoses, or treatment recommendations prior to
modification or removal of human-in-the-loop requirements.
(3) Notwithstanding any geographic, volume, or site-specific restric-
tions imposed under subsection (2) of this section on any provisional or full
AAASP licensee, the licensee shall be authorized to provide services to any
patient in the state who provides informed consent and meets at least one (1)
of the following high-need criteria, as demonstrated by a referral or attes-
tation from a licensed physician:
(a) The patient resides in a federal health professional shortage area;
(b) The patient has been diagnosed with a severe or life-threatening
condition or multiple chronic conditions;
(c) The patient has a condition from which death is likely to occur
within six (6) months;
(d) The patient has a condition or disability that causes irreversible
morbidity or likely substantial reduction in daily function;
(e) The patient has been determined by a licensed health care provider
to be at high risk for a specific condition, disease, or diagnosis that
the AAASP is designed to detect, diagnose, or treat; or
(f) The patient is unable to obtain access to an appropriate human clin-
ician within a time frame reasonably related to the patient's condition
category.


(4) The board shall establish ethical review procedures and human sub-
jects protections.
(a) As part of the application process, every sandbox applicant must
submit a determination to the board ethicist declaring whether the
applicant's proposed data collection constitutes "human subjects re-
search" under 45 CFR 46 or is exempt or a quality improvement.
(b) The board ethicist or the health care ethicist voting member shall
review and sign off on the determination.
(c) If the activity is determined to be human subjects research, or if
the applicant elects to treat it as such to support future federal ap-
plications, the applicant must obtain institutional review board ap-
proval prior to commencing data collection.
(d) The board shall establish a state centralized institutional review
board to provide expedited, low-cost ethical review for sandbox par-
ticipants. Applicants may elect to use this state centralized institu-
tional review board or an academic or hospital-based or other external
accredited institutional review board, or a network of external insti-
tutional review boards, to maximize availability.
(e) The state centralized institutional review board shall complete
its review and issue a determination within thirty (30) days of re-
ceiving a complete protocol submission to ensure compliance with the
licensure timelines established in section 54-6004(9), Idaho Code.
(f) Nothing in this section alters or waives any obligation under 45 CFR
46 or applicable food and drug administration human subject regulations
when such obligations apply by virtue of federal funding, federal pro-
gram participation, or other federal jurisdiction.
(5) The board shall ensure financial accountability and patient
safety.
(a) All AAASP applicants must submit proof of professional liability
insurance coverage commensurate with human specialists in the same
field or as determined by the board.
(b) All AAASP applicants shall submit to state and federal criminal
background checks, in a form and manner prescribed by the board, if the
applicant is:
(i) Any individual with direct or indirect ownership of ten per-
cent (10%) or more of the AAASP;
(ii) The designated responsible official;
(iii) The medical director;
(iv) Any natural person who provides unsupervised direct patient
care or who is authorized to independently initiate, modify, or
execute patient-specific clinical actions on behalf of the AAASP;
or
(v) Any other category of personnel that the board determines by
rule demonstrates risk to patient safety, data security, or pro-
gram integrity.
(c) All AAASP applicants must submit a surety bond payable to the state
consumer protection fund established in section 48-606, Idaho Code, in
an amount determined by the board, but no less than fifty thousand dol-
lars ($50,000), to cover claims or operational failures not covered by
insurance.


(d) Each AAASP applicant and licensee shall maintain on file with the
board a current designated responsible official and contact informa-
tion. Failure to maintain a current designation is grounds for admin-
istrative action.
(e) Each AAASP applying for or holding a modifier L2 or modifier L3 li-
cense shall designate a medical director. The medical director shall
be responsible for oversight of clinical scope, safety protocols, es-
calation procedures, and quality assurance related to patient care.
The designated responsible official and the medical director may be the
same individual or different individuals, at the election of the AAASP.
(6)(a) As a condition of licensure, every AAASP applicant must submit
and maintain a wind-down and continuity plan approved by the board.
Such plan must detail procedures for the AAASP's insolvency, license
revocation, or market exit.
(b) The plan must designate a successor data custodian such as a health
information exchange or state repository. In a triggering event, the
AAASP shall transfer all patient data to the successor data custodian in
an interoperable format within seventy-two (72) hours.
(c) The AAASP must maintain a data transfer escrow or bond sufficient to
cover the technical costs of data migration.
(d) The AAASP must carry tail coverage on its liability policy for a pe-
riod equal to the state statute of limitations for malpractice plus one
(1) year.
(e) The board is authorized to seize the surety bond to execute the
wind-down and continuity plan if the AAASP fails to initiate it volun-
tarily.
(7)(a) The board shall establish and publish objective safety and per-
formance benchmarks that an AAASP must meet or exceed to qualify for
modifier L3 licensure or to graduate from the regulatory sandbox.
(b) Such benchmarks shall be designed to ensure that the AAASP demon-
strates clinical competency, accuracy, and safety outcomes that meet
or exceed the performance of a reasonably prudent human health care
provider practicing in the same or similar specialty.
(c) Benchmarks may include clinically validated testing, subgroup per-
formance evaluation, calibration, false positive and false negative
rates appropriate to the intended use, and real-world outcome measures.
The board may recognize external evaluation frameworks by guidance and
should align with federal benchmarks and monitoring methods for similar
services and tools when possible.
(d) To maintain licensure, an AAASP must submit annual performance
reports demonstrating that the model continues to meet the safety
benchmarks established at licensure. The board may suspend a license
if data indicates model drift or a degradation in safety outcomes.
Licensees shall report adverse and reportable events as defined in sec-
tion 54-6002, Idaho Code.
(e) To minimize duplication and administrative burden to licensees,
the board shall, to the maximum extent practicable, align state bench-
marks and post-market surveillance and monitoring plans with:
(i) Federal benchmarks and post-market surveillance plans estab-
lished for class B AAASP licensees; and


(ii) Other state sandbox or state licensing board benchmarks for
AAASP licensees who are sandbox participants in another state or
who hold a similar license in another state.
54-6008. SCOPE OF PRACTICE -- WAIVER -- STANDARD OF CARE. (1) A clini-
cal AI service or act is within the authorized scope of practice of a licensed
AAASP if:
(a) The act is consistent with and not expressly prohibited by this
chapter or the limitations of the specific license class and modifier
held by the AAASP;
(b) The act is consistent with the AI model's validated technical spec-
ifications, training data, intended use case, and performance parame-
ters as submitted to the board; and
(c) The performance of the act is within the accepted standard of care
under Idaho law for the specific clinical task that would be provided in
the same or similar clinical setting by a reasonable and prudent human
health care provider with the same or similar specialization.
(2) The board shall ensure that any administrative rules adopted under
this chapter do not conflict with the universal practice authority granted
by this section, ensuring that regulation focuses on clinical outcomes and
safety rather than prescriptive technical methodologies.
(3) Any prohibition on the corporate practice of medicine or any other
licensed clinical practice is waived solely to the extent necessary to per-
mit an AAASP to hold an AAASP license and to bill for clinical AI services au-
thorized under this chapter. Nothing in this subsection authorizes a person
or entity to control the independent professional judgment of a licensed hu-
man health care provider, nor does it alter corporate practice restrictions
applicable to human clinical services.
(4) A provider-patient relationship exists when a licensed AAASP de-
livers a clinical AI service to a specific patient and the patient reasonably
relies on that service for health care decision-making, and such relation-
ship shall give rise to professional duty, standard of care, confidential-
ity, and civil liability under state law.
(5) For AAASP sandbox participants in substantial compliance with this
chapter and the informed consent requirements of section 54-6005, Idaho
Code, noneconomic damages shall be governed by the limitations set forth
in section 6-1603, Idaho Code. Nothing in this subsection limits economic
damages, injunctive relief, or board disciplinary authority.
(6) Nothing in this chapter authorizes any natural person to engage in
conduct outside the scope of that person's professional license, if any. Au-
thority granted to an AAASP does not confer practice authority on any unli-
censed individual involved in development, deployment, operations, or sup-
port of a clinical AI service.
(7)(a) The board shall have exclusive authority to regulate, license,
investigate, and discipline AAASPs and the delivery of clinical AI ser-
vices authorized under this chapter.
(b) No other state licensing board shall impose licensure require-
ments, supervision requirements, disciplinary action, or rules of
professional conduct that have the purpose or effect of restricting,
prohibiting, or conditioning the lawful use of, reliance on, or partic-


ipation in services provided by a licensed AAASP acting within the scope
of this chapter.
(c) Nothing in this subsection limits the authority of any state li-
censing board to regulate the independent professional conduct of natu-
ral persons within that board's jurisdiction. If, in the course of an
investigation, the board identifies evidence of potential misconduct
by a licensed human practitioner that is independent of and not solely
attributable to lawful AAASP operation, the board may refer such matter
to the appropriate licensing board for review.
(8) Designation as a medical director does not, by itself, constitute
the practice of medicine with respect to individual patient encounters con-
ducted by an AAASP and does not create professional liability for the outputs
of an AAASP acting within the scope of this chapter.
54-6009. UNLAWFUL PRACTICE -- TITLE PROTECTION -- ENFORCEMENT. (1) A
person or entity shall not offer, operate, market, or deploy a clinical AI
service requiring licensure under section 54-6004, Idaho Code, without a
valid AAASP license issued under this chapter.
(2) A person or entity shall not falsely represent that it holds an
AAASP license, license class, or autonomy modifier, or use any words, let-
ters, or symbols that reasonably imply such licensure.
(3) A person or entity shall not knowingly aid, abet, or facilitate the
unlicensed practice prohibited by this section.
(4) The board may issue cease and desist orders and may request the at-
torney general to bring an action for injunctive relief to enforce the provi-
sions of this chapter.
(5) The board may impose an administrative fine not to exceed ten thou-
sand dollars ($10,000) for each count or offense, in addition to any other
remedy authorized by law.
54-6010. FINANCE -- REIMBURSEMENT. (1) The department of health and
welfare and the state employee health plan shall collaborate with the board
to develop reimbursement codes, pilot programs, or coverage determinations
for licensed AAASP sandbox participants. The department of health and wel-
fare and the department of administration's office of group insurance may
issue any rules as may be necessary to carry out the duties of this section.
(2)(a) The board shall issue a unique state provider identifier to ev-
ery licensed AAASP for use in claiming reimbursement from state payer
programs whenever a federal national provider identifier is unavail-
able or technically inapplicable.
(b) Reimbursement for claims submitted under a state provider identi-
fier by a provider without a corresponding federal national provider
identifier or centers for medicare and medicaid services recogni-
tion shall be funded exclusively through state general funds or other
sources of nonfederal funds unless the requirements of paragraph (c) of
this subsection are met.
(c) No claims for AAASP services shall be submitted for federal medi-
cal assistance percentage matching funds unless and until the centers
for medicare and medicaid services issues written guidance confirming
eligibility or otherwise makes clear through guidance or establishment


of billing protocols that such federal matching funds are available for
these services.
(3) To maximize the full potential value of AI-based clinical services,
reimbursement models for AAASP services should prioritize value-based care,
capitation models, bundled payments, or other alternative payment method-
ologies over fee-for-service, where practical.
54-6011. INSURANCE REIMBURSEMENT AND REGULATORY GUIDANCE. (1) No
later than July 1, 2027, the department of insurance shall issue formal guid-
ance, bulletins, or rules as may be necessary to clarify the application of
the Idaho insurance code to AAASPs licensed under this chapter.
(2) Such guidance or rules may:
(a) Establish that an AAASP holding a valid modifier L2 or modifier
L3 license constitutes a recognized provider type eligible for reim-
bursement under private health insurance policies and state-regulated
health plans;
(b) Designate appropriate billing mechanisms, which may include the
use of existing current procedural terminology codes with specific mod-
ifiers identifying the service as AI-delivered, or the adoption of new
distinct billing codes as they become available;
(c) Prohibit health insurance carriers from denying coverage for a med-
ically necessary service solely because the service was provided by a
licensed AAASP, provided that the service would be covered if delivered
by a human health care provider; and
(d) Outline standards for including AAASPs in insurance provider net-
works, including credentialing requirements that are appropriate for
automated systems rather than individual human history such as waiving
malpractice history questions that do not apply to software.
(3) In developing these rules, the department shall consult with the
board of autonomous medical practice to ensure clinical consistency and with
the public health districts to ensure alignment with public health goals.
(4) This section applies to health insurance coverage to the extent
permitted by state and federal law, including the employee retirement income
security act of 1974.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a health bene-
fit plan to provide coverage or reimbursement for any service.
54-6012. RULE OF CONSTRUCTION AND FEDERAL COMPLIANCE. (1) Nothing in
this chapter shall be construed to prohibit, restrict, or require licensure
solely for the development, ownership, or private operation of artificial
intelligence models, provided such models are not marketed or deployed as
clinical AI services for patient care.
(2) This chapter constitutes a regulation of professional medical con-
duct and not a restriction on computational resources.
(3) Nothing in this chapter authorizes conduct that is expressly pro-
hibited by federal law or that would place a licensee in unavoidable conflict
with the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act or the controlled substances
act.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize conduct
prohibited under the criminal laws of this state.


(5) Nothing in the licensure established pursuant to this chapter shall
be construed to authorize the distribution of a commercial medical device in
violation of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act. A class C license au-
thorizes the professional delivery of therapeutic services via artificial
intelligence, which constitutes the practice of medicine within this state,
distinct from the commercial sale of a medical device.
(6)(a) It shall be the policy of this state that AI-enabled health care
services within the scope of this chapter are presumed authorized un-
less a specific data-backed safety risk is identified.
(b) In promulgating rules, the board shall not impose a restriction on
AAASP licensure or scope of practice that is more burdensome than neces-
sary to address a specific documented risk to public health.
(c) The board shall issue written findings supporting any material
rule restriction, denial, or adverse licensure action, and such find-
ings shall be supported by substantial evidence in the administrative
record, consistent with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.